Maine, session 132, LD1621.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (11) to read:
(11) Costs associated with the operation and financial support of:
(a) Affordable housing in the municipality or plantation to serve ongoing
economic development efforts, including the further development of the
downtown tax increment financing districts; and
(b) Housing programs and services to assist those who are experiencing
homelessness in the municipality or plantation as defined in the municipality's
or plantation's development program; and
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (12) to read:
(12) Up to 50% of the capital costs related to the construction or renovation of a
municipality's or plantation's central administrative office, the need for which is
related to general economic development within the municipality or plantation, not
to exceed 15% of the captured assessed value of the development district; and
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (13) to read:
(13) Costs associated with projects for the restoration and protection of lakes
conducted by municipalities or persons designated by a municipality to conduct
such projects. As used in this subparagraph, "projects for the restoration and
protection of lakes" includes, but is not limited to, alum treatments, invasive
aquatic plants and nuisance species monitoring and erosion control programs and
providing matching funds for a grant program for those types of projects;